Utah statutes.
69-2-6.   Jurisdiction and employee immunity.
In implementing a 911 emergency telephone service, the public agency and
public safety agencies and their employees shall cooperate in establishing the
service and in its day-to-day provision.  Any employee of any public safety
agency which is a participant in a 911 emergency telephone service may respond
and take any action to any call whether within or without the authorized
territorial jurisdiction of the public safety agency.  In response to
emergency calls, employees of public safety agencies shall have the same
immunity for any acts performed in the line of duty outside their authorized
jurisdictions as they enjoy within their authorized jurisdictions.  No cause
of action is created by any incorrect dispatch or response by any system or
any public safety agency or by reason of elapsed response time.
